Arkansas, session 2025, SB444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-80-503(5), concerning the definition of
healthcare service within the Medical Ethics and Diversity Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(5) “Healthcare service” means medical research or medical care
provided to a patient at any time over the entire course of treatment,
including without limitation:
(A) Initial examination;
(B) Patient referral;
(C) Counseling or psychological therapy;
(D) Therapy;
(E) Testing;
(F) Research;
(G) Diagnosis or prognosis;
(H) Instruction;
(I) Dispensing or administering, or both, of any drug,
medication, or device;
(J) Set up or performance of a surgery or other procedure;
(K) Recordkeeping and recordmaking procedures and notes
*JMB497*
03-20-2025 10:16:54 JMB497

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB444
related to treatment; and
(L) Other care or services provided by a medical
practitioner or healthcare institution;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-80-504 is amended to read as follows:
17-80-504. Right of conscience.
(a) A medical practitioner, healthcare institution, or healthcare
payer:
(1) Has the right not to participate in a healthcare service
that violates his, her, or its conscience;
(2) Is not required to participate in a healthcare service that
violates his, her, or its conscience;
(3) Is not civilly, criminally, or administratively liable for
declining to participate in a healthcare service that violates his, her, or
its conscience;
(4) Is not civilly, criminally, or administratively liable for
the exercise of conscience rights not to participate in a healthcare service
by a medical practitioner employed, contracted, or granted admitting
privileges by a healthcare institution; and
(5) Shall not be discriminated against in any manner based upon
his, her, or its declining to participate in a healthcare service that
violates his, her, or its conscience.
(b) Exercise of the right of conscience is limited to conscience-based
objections to a particular healthcare service.
(c) A worker in the medical field, whether a contractor or employee,
has the right to not facilitate or participate in an abortion, assisted
suicide, or gender transition procedure or service in any manner, except as
required by subsection (e) of this section and an abortion performed in
accordance with the Arkansas Human Life Protection Act, § 5-61-301 et seq.,
and the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection Act, § 5-1-401 et seq.
(d) A medical practitioner, healthcare institution, or healthcare
payer that holds himself, herself, or itself out to the public as religious,
states in its governing documents that it has a religious purpose or mission,
and has internal operating policies or procedures that implement its
religious beliefs has the right to make employment, staffing, contracting,
and admitting privilege decisions consistent with his, her, or its religious
03-20-2025 10:16:54 JMB497

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB444
beliefs.
(d)(e)(1) The right of conscience described in subsection (a) of this
section does not include the right to deny emergency medical care as required
under 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd, as existing on January 1, 2021, or any other
federal law governing emergency medical treatment, as existing on January 1,
2021.
(2) Emergency medical care services provided at a hospital that
are required by 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd, as existing on January 1, 2025, and
performed in accordance with the requirements of the Arkansas Human Life
Protection Act, § 5-61-301 et seq., and the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection
Act, § 5-1-401 et seq., are not violations of this subchapter.
(e)(1)(f)(1) When a medical practitioner declines to participate in a
healthcare service for reasons of conscience, the medical practitioner shall
alert the employing healthcare institution at the earliest reasonable time
and comply with any applicable protocol developed under this section.
(2)(A) A healthcare institution may develop a protocol for
situations in which a medical practitioner declines to participate in a
healthcare service.
(B) The protocol shall provide for prompt patient access
to medical records to facilitate transfer, if needed.
(3) This section does not require a healthcare institution or
medical practitioner to perform a healthcare service, counsel, or refer a
patient regarding a healthcare service that is contrary to the conscience of
the medical practitioner or healthcare institution.
(f)(1)(g)(1) This section does not prohibit an employer or contracting
healthcare institution from disclosing the specific healthcare services that
an applicant would be required to participate in if he or she is hired for
the position or contract.
(2) Upon being informed of the specific healthcare services
required of the position or contract, the applicant shall disclose whether
he, she, or it has a conscience objection to any of those required duties.
(3) However, a medical practitioner or healthcare institution
shall be able to decline to participate in a healthcare service that violates
his, her, or its conscience if the employer or contracting healthcare
institution, after employment, adds healthcare services to a medical
practitioner's or healthcare institution's duties that would require the
03-20-2025 10:16:54 JMB497

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB444
medical practitioner or healthcare institution to provide services that
violate his, her, or its conscience.
(g)(1)(h)(1) A healthcare payer shall file its conscience policies
annually with the State Insurance Department by including a comprehensive
list by billing code of any and all products, services, and procedures that
the healthcare payer shall not pay or make payment for reasons of conscience.
(2) The annual filing described in subdivision (g)(1) (h)(1) of
this section shall:
(A) Be provided annually to each beneficiary of the
healthcare payer and on the website of the healthcare payer; and
(B) Not be required for any year in which the healthcare
payer will not exercise its conscience rights under this subchapter.
(h)(i) A healthcare payer shall not use a conscience objection to
refuse or reduce payments to a healthcare provider, healthcare institution,
or beneficiary for any product, service, or procedure that is not included in
the annual filing required under subdivision (g)(1) (h)(1) of this section.
(i)(j) A healthcare payer shall not compel by undue influence, fraud,
or duress a healthcare provider, healthcare institution, or beneficiary to
accept a contract or contract amendment that violates the conscience of the
healthcare provider, healthcare institution, or beneficiary.
(j)(k) The department may issue rules and take any other action
necessary or appropriate to enforce subsections (g)-(i) (h)-(j) of this
section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 80, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
17-80-507. Protection from discrimination.
(a) A healthcare provider shall not be discriminated against because
the healthcare provider:
(1) Provided, caused to be provided, or is about to provide or
cause to be provided information relating to any act or omission the
healthcare provider reasonably believes to be a violation of any provision of
this subchapter to:
(A) His or her employer;
(B) The Attorney General;
(C) The Department of Health;
03-20-2025 10:16:54 JMB497

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB444
(D) Any state agency charged with protecting healthcare
rights of conscience;
(E) The United States Department of Health and Human
Services;
(F) The United States Office for Civil Rights; or
(G) Any state or federal agency charged with protecting
healthcare rights of conscience; or
(2) Testified, assisted, or participated, or is about to
testify, assist, or participate, in a proceeding concerning a violation.
(b) Unless the disclosure is specifically prohibited by law, a medical
researcher, physician, or directly participating healthcare provider shall
not be discriminated against because the medical researcher, physician, or
directly participating healthcare provider discloses information, including
by a formal or informal communication, transmission, or discussion, that the
medical researcher, physician, or directly participating healthcare provider
reasonably believes evidences:
(1) Any violation of any law related to medical research or the
provision of healthcare services; or
(2) Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of
authority, a practice or method of treatment that may put patient health at
risk, or a substantial and specific danger to public health or safety.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, a complaint
by a medical practitioner against another medical practitioner shall be
submitted according to the peer review process mandated by the Health Care
Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. § 11101 et seq., as existing on
January 1, 2025.

17-80-508. First Amendment protections.
(a)(1) A state licensing, certifying, or recognizing board or entity,
or the Department of Health, shall not reprimand, sanction, revoke, or
threaten to revoke a license, certification, or registration of, or otherwise
discriminate against, a medical practitioner for engaging in speech,
expression, or association that is protected from government interference by
the First Amendment of the United States Constitution, unless the board,
entity, or the department, as applicable, demonstrates by clear and
convincing evidence that the medical practitioner’s speech, expression, or
03-20-2025 10:16:54 JMB497

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB444
association was the direct cause of physical harm to a person with whom the
medical practitioner had a practitioner-patient relationship within the three
(3) years immediately preceding the incident of physical harm.
(2) The licensing, certifying, or recognizing board or entity,
or the department, as applicable, shall:
(A) Provide a medical practitioner with any complaints it
has received that may result in the revocation of the medical practitioner’s
license, certification, or registration, within twenty-one (21) days after
receipt of the complaint; and
(B) Pay the medical practitioner an administrative penalty
of five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the complaint is not provided to
the medical practitioner after the specified twenty-one (21) days.
(b) A political subdivision of this state shall not contract with,
approve, or require an individual to obtain certifications or credentials
issued or approved by a specialty board or other recognizing or certifying
entity that revokes the certification of, or refuses to issue certification
to, an individual because the individual has engaged in speech, expression,
or association that is protected from government interference by the First
Amendment of the United States Constitution if the individual was not
providing medical advice or treatment to a specific patient that resulted in
physical harm to the patient.

/s/K. Hammer













03-20-2025 10:16:54 JMB497